th: รูปแบบของยาสูบเคี้ยว: เส้นยาวพิเศษ; เส้นเล็ก; เส้นยาว; ใบหลวม; อัดก้อน; เกลียว; อื่นๆ
da: Form af tyggetobak: Ekstra groft skåret; Fint skåret; Groft skåret; Løse blade; Kompakt (plug); Rullet (twist); Andet
zh-TW: 口嚼菸草形式: 特長切; 細切; 長切; 散葉; 塊狀; 麻花捲; 其他
sl-SI: Oblika žvečilnega tobaka: Zelo dolg rez; Fini rez; Dolg rez; V lističih; Blok; Zvitek; Drugo
pt-BR: Forma do tabaco de mascar: Corte extralongo; Corte fino; Corte longo; Folha solta; Prensado; Torcido; Outro
hr-HR: Oblik duhana za žvakanje: Iznimno dugački rez; Fini rez; Dugački rez; U listićima; Prešani (plug); Uvijeni (twist); Ostalo
pt-PT: Forma do tabaco de mascar: Corte extra longo; Corte fino; Corte longo; Folha solta; Bloco; Torção; Outra
de: Form des Kautabaks: Extra langer Schnitt; Feinschnitt; Grobschnitt; Lose Blätter; Plug; Twist; Sonstiges
lt-LT: Kramtomojo tabako forma: Ypač stambaus pjovimo; Smulkaus pjovimo; Stambaus pjovimo; Birių lapų; Presuotas; Susuktas; Kita
el: Μορφή μασώμενου καμπνού: Εξαιρετικά μακριά κοπή; Ψιλή κοπή; Μακριά κοπή; Χύμα φύλλα; Πρέσα; Πλεξούδα; Άλλο
es: Presentación del tabaco de mascar: Corte extralargo; Corte fino; Corte largo; Hoja suelta; Prensado; Trenzado; Otro
ko: 씹는 담배 형태: 엑스트라 롱 컷; 파인 컷; 롱 컷; 루스 리프; 플러그; 트위스트; 기타
nb: Tyggetobakkform: Ekstra langt snitt; Fint snitt; Langt snitt; Løse blader; Plugg; Snurret; Annet
ja: 噛みタバコの形状: エクストラロングカット; ファインカット; ロングカット; ルーズリーフ; プラグ; ツイスト; その他
sk-SK: Forma žuvacieho tabaku: Extra dlhý rez (Extra Long Cut); Jemný rez (Fine Cut); Dlhý rez (Long Cut); Voľné listy; Kocka (Plug); Zvitok (Twist); Iné
vi: Dạng thuốc lá nhai: Sợi rất dài; Sợi nhuyễn; Sợi dài; Lá rời; Ép khối; Dạng xoắn; Khác
pl: Forma tytoniu do żucia: Extra Long Cut; Fine Cut; Long Cut; Liściasty (Loose Leaf); Sprasowany (Plug); Skręcany (Twist); Inna
ro-RO: Forma tutunului de mestecat: Tăietură extra lungă; Tăietură fină; Tăietură lungă; Frunze libere; Plug; Twist; Altele
sv: Tuggtobaksform: Extra long cut; Fine cut; Long cut; Loose leaf; Plug; Twist; Övrigt
bg-BG: Форма на тютюна за дъвчене: Много едро нарязан; Фино нарязан; Едро нарязан; На листа; На плочки; Навити листа (twist); Други
zh-CN: 咀嚼烟草形态: 特长切丝; 细切丝; 长切丝; 散叶; 块状; 辫状; 其他
en: Chewing tobacco form: Extra Long Cut; Fine Cut; Long Cut; Loose Leaf; Plug; Twist; Other
hu: Rágódohány formája: Extra hosszú szálú; Finomra vágott; Hosszú szálú; Szálas; Plug (préselt); Twist (sodort); Egyéb
it: Forma di tabacco da masticare: Taglio extra lungo; Taglio fine; Taglio lungo; Foglia sciolta; Plug; Twist; Altro
cs: Forma žvýkacího tabáku: Extra dlouhý řez; Jemný řez; Dlouhý řez; Sypaný list; Lisovaný (plug); Kroucený (twist); Jiná
tr: Çiğneme tütünü formu: Ekstra uzun kesim; İnce kesim; Uzun kesim; Açık yaprak; Kalıp; Örgü; Diğer
nl: Pruimtabak vorm: Extra lang gesneden; Fijn gesneden; Lang gesneden; Losse bladeren; Plug; Twist; Overig
ru: Форма жевательного табака: Очень крупная нарезка; Мелкая нарезка; Крупная нарезка; Листовой; Прессованный (Плаг); Крученый (Твист); Другое
fi: Purutupakan muoto: Extra Long Cut; Fine Cut; Long Cut; Loose Leaf; Plugi; Kierre; Muu
fr: Forme du tabac à chiquer: Coupe très longue; Coupe fine; Coupe longue; En vrac; Pressé; Torsadé; Autre